Utah statutes.
75-2a-103.   Definitions.
As used in this chapter:
(1)  "Adult" means a person who is:
(a)  at least 18 years of age; or
(b)  an emancipated minor.
(2)  "Advance health care directive":
(a)  includes:
(i)  a designation of an agent to make health care decisions for an adult when
the adult cannot make or communicate health care decisions; or
(ii)  an expression of preferences about health care decisions;
(b)  may take one of the following forms:
(i)  a written document, voluntarily executed by an adult in accordance with
the requirements of this chapter; or
(ii)  a witnessed oral statement, made in accordance with the requirements of
this chapter; and
(c)  does not include a life with dignity order.
(3)  "Agent" means a person designated in an advance health care directive to
make health care decisions for the declarant.
(4)  "APRN" means a person who is:
(a)  certified or licensed as an advance practice registered nurse under
Subsection 58-31b-301(2)(d);
(b)  an independent practitioner;
(c)  acting under a consultation and referral plan with a physician; and
(d)  acting within the scope of practice for that person, as provided by law,
rule, and specialized certification and training in that person's area of
practice.
(5)  "Best interest" means that the benefits to the person resulting from a
treatment outweigh the burdens to the person resulting from the treatment,
taking into account:
(a)  the effect of the treatment on the physical, emotional, and cognitive
functions of the person;
(b)  the degree of physical pain or discomfort caused to the person by the
treatment or the withholding or withdrawal of treatment;
(c)  the degree to which the person's medical condition, the treatment, or the
withholding or withdrawal of treatment, result in a severe and continuing
impairment of the dignity of the person by subjecting the person to
humiliation and dependency;
(d)  the effect of the treatment on the life expectancy of the person;
(e)  the prognosis of the person for recovery with and without the treatment;
(f)  the risks, side effects, and benefits of the treatment, or the
withholding or withdrawal of treatment; and
(g)  the religious beliefs and basic values of the person receiving treatment,
to the extent these may assist the decision maker in determining the best
interest.
(6)  "Capacity to appoint an agent" means that the adult understands the
consequences of appointing a particular person as agent.
(7)  "Declarant" means an adult who has completed and signed or directed the
signing of an advance health care directive.
(8)  "Default surrogate" means the adult who may make decisions for an
individual when either:
(a)  an agent or guardian has not been appointed; or
(b)  an agent is not able, available, or willing to make decisions for an
adult.
(9)  "Emergency medical services provider" means a person who is licensed,
designated, or certified under Title 26, Chapter 8a, Utah Emergency Medical
Services System Act.
(10)  "Generally accepted health care standards":
(a)  is defined only for the purpose of:
(i)  this chapter and does not define the standard of care for any other
purpose under Utah law; and
(ii)  enabling health care providers to interpret the statutory form set forth
in Section 75-2a-117; and
(b)  means the standard of care that justifies a provider in declining to
provide life sustaining care because the proposed life sustaining care:
(i)  will not prevent or reduce the deterioration in the health or functional
status of a person;
(ii)  will not prevent the impending death of a person; or
(iii)  will impose more burden on the person than any expected benefit to the
person.
(11)  "Health care" means any care, treatment, service, or procedure to
improve, maintain, diagnose, or otherwise affect a person's physical or mental
condition.
(12)  "Health care decision":
(a)  means a decision about an adult's health care made by, or on behalf of,
an adult, that is communicated to a health care provider;
(b)  includes:
(i)  selection and discharge of a health care provider and a health care
facility;
(ii)  approval or disapproval of diagnostic tests, procedures, programs of
medication, and orders not to resuscitate; and
(iii)  directions to provide, withhold, or withdraw artificial nutrition and
hydration and all other forms of health care; and
(c)  does not include decisions about an adult's financial affairs or social
interactions other than as indirectly affected by the health care decision.
(13)  "Health care decision making capacity" means an adult's ability to make
an informed decision about receiving or refusing health care, including:
(a)  the ability to understand the nature, extent, or probable consequences of
health status and health care alternatives;
(b)  the ability to make a rational evaluation of the burdens, risks,
benefits, and alternatives of accepting or rejecting health care; and
(c)  the ability to communicate a decision.
(14)  "Health care facility" means:
(a)  a health care facility as defined in Title 26, Chapter 21, Health Care
Facility Licensing and Inspection Act; and
(b)  private offices of physicians, dentists, and other health care providers
licensed to provide health care under Title 58, Occupations and Professions.
(15)  "Health care provider" is as defined in Section 78B-3-403, except that
it does not include an emergency medical services provider.
(16) (a)  "Life sustaining care" means any medical intervention, including
procedures, administration of medication, or use of a medical device, that
maintains life by sustaining, restoring, or supplanting a vital function.
(b)  "Life sustaining care" does not include care provided for the purpose of
keeping a person comfortable.
(17)  "Life with dignity order" means an order, designated by the Department
of Health under Section 75-2a-106(5)(a), that gives direction to health care
providers, health care facilities, and emergency medical services providers
regarding the specific health care decisions of the person to whom the order
relates.
(18)  "Minor" means a person who:
(a)  is under 18 years of age; and
(b)  is not an emancipated minor.
(19)  "Physician" means a physician and surgeon or osteopathic surgeon
licensed under Title 58, Chapter 67, Utah Medical Practice Act or Chapter 68,
Utah Osteopathic Medical Practice Act.
(20)  "Physician assistant" means a person licensed as a physician assistant
under Title 58, Chapter 70a, Physician Assistant Act.
(21)  "Reasonably available" means:
(a)  readily able to be contacted without undue effort; and
(b)  willing and able to act in a timely manner considering the urgency of the
circumstances.
(22)  "Substituted judgment" means the standard to be applied by a surrogate
when making a health care decision for an adult who previously had the
capacity to make health care decisions, which requires the surrogate to
consider:
(a)  specific preferences expressed by the adult:
(i)  when the adult had the capacity to make health care decisions; and
(ii)  at the time the decision is being made;
(b)  the surrogate's understanding of the adult's health care preferences;
(c)  the surrogate's understanding of what the adult would have wanted under
the circumstances; and
(d)  to the extent that the preferences described in Subsections (22)(a)
through (c) are unknown, the best interest of the adult.
(23)  "Surrogate" means a health care decision maker who is:
(a)  an appointed agent;
(b)  a default surrogate under the provisions of Section 75-2a-108; or
(c)  a guardian.
